dictionaries/lb/index.aff
FLAG long
SFX k7 N 53
SFX k7 ub ibbchen/d0 ub is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 uert iertchen/d1 [Ww]uert is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 ul ilchen/d0 ul is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 ueb iebchen/d0 ueb is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 ueder iederchen/r3 ueder is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 ugel igelchen/r3 ugel is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 uet ietchen/d0 uet is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 upp ippchen/d0 upp is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 urscht irschtchen/d0 urscht is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 af iefchen/d1 af is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 ued iedchen/d0 ued is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 uerm iermchen/d0 uerm is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 ummer immerchen/r3 ummer is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 utt ittchen/d0 utt is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 on eenchen/d0 on is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 uerz ierzchen/d0 uerz is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 uedem iedemchen/r3 uedem is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 ues ieschen/d0 ues is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 unn innchen/d0 unn is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 utz itzelchen/r3 utz is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 ad iedchen/d1 [Ppt]ad is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 uf ifchen/d1 uf is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 us ischen/d0 us is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 at ietchen/d1 at is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 am eemchen/d0 am is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 ad iedchen/d0 [Rr]ad is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 uerf ierfchen/d0 uerf is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 aass iesschen/d1 aass is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 ull illchen/d0 ull is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 umm immchen/d0 umm is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 um imchen/d0 um is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 as ieschen/d0 as is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 uuss iisschen/d0 uuss is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 udder idderchen/r3 udder is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 uch ichelchen/r3 uch is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 unkt inktelchen/r3 unkt is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 uucht iichtchen/d0 uucht is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 dden tchen/d0 dden is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 uddel iddelchen/r3 uddel is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 utsch itschelchen/r3 utsch is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 ut itchen/d0 [Tt]ut is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 our ierchen/d0 our is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 uer ierchen/r3 uer is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 uert iertchen/d0 [Hh]uert is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 om eemchen/d0 lom is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 oder eederchen/r3 oder is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 ut itchen/d1 aut is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 uff iffchen/d0 uff is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 of eefchen/d1 of is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 uerzel ierzelchen/r3 uerzel is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 ütt ittchen/d0 ütt is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 Oder Eederchen/r3 Oder is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k7 0 tchen/d0 g is:diminutive is:singular

SFX k5 N 1
SFX k5 0 chen/c0 . is:diminutive is:singular

SFX i2 N 3
SFX i2 p mchen/d0 p is:m2f is:feminine is:diminutive is:singular
SFX i2 brudder schwësterchen/r3 brudder is:m2f is:feminine is:diminutive is:singular
SFX i2 pätter giedelchen/r3 pätter is:m2f is:feminine is:diminutive is:singular

SFX x0 N 1
SFX x0 0 d/a0 . is:adjective is:papr

SFX u0 N 23
SFX u0 aass ässer aass is:plural
SFX u0 ach ächer [^g][fl]ach is:plural
SFX u0 ass ässer [^a]ass is:plural
SFX u0 and änner and is:plural
SFX u0 ann änner ann is:plural
SFX u0 alt älter alt is:plural
SFX u0 ong énger ong is:plural
SFX u0 ott ëtter ott is:plural
SFX u0 ascht äschter ascht is:plural
SFX u0 och écher och is:plural
SFX u0 ond ënner ond is:plural
SFX u0 all äller all is:plural
SFX u0 ollek ëlker ollek is:plural
SFX u0 amt ämter amt is:plural
SFX u0 ach äicher glach is:plural
SFX u0 auch äicher auch is:plural
SFX u0 ach ächer [FL]ach is:plural
SFX u0 chen ërcher chen is:plural
SFX u0 aach äächer aach is:plural
SFX u0 oft ëfter oft is:plural
SFX u0 olz ëlzer olz is:plural
SFX u0 n 0 en is:eifeler
SFX u0 Amt Ämter Amt is:plural

SFX k8 N 4
SFX k8 oft ëftchen/c0 oft is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k8 om eemchen/c0 om is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k8 ad iedchen/c0 ad is:diminutive is:singular
SFX k8 uert iertchen/c0 uert is:diminutive is:singular

SFX h0 N 12
SFX h0 äin engem äin
SFX h0 äin engen/c0 äin
SFX h0 äin enger äin
SFX h0 n 0 n
SFX h0 0 es [^n]
SFX h0 0 t [^r]
SFX h0 r ert r
SFX h0 0 em [^n]
SFX h0 0 en/c0 [^n]
SFX h0 0 er [^n]
SFX h0 äin enges äin
SFX h0 äin eng äin

SFX i3 N 2
SFX i3 persoun mann/u0 persoun is:n2m is:masculine is:singular
SFX i3 persoun fra/n0 persoun is:n2f is:feminine is:singular

SFX s2 N 1
SFX s2 0 s .

SFX s1 N 5
SFX s1 er res er
SFX s1 0 es [^nrt]
SFX s1 éift ibes éift
SFX s1 t den/c0 rt
SFX s1 chen erchers chen

SFX j0 N 1
SFX j0 0 i/n0 . is:nunu is:singular

SFX j1 N 13
SFX j1 ond ënni/n0 ond is:nunu is:singular
SFX j1 ull illi/n0 ull is:nunu is:singular
SFX j1 upp ippi/n0 upp is:nunu is:singular
SFX j1 app äppi/n0 app is:nunu is:singular
SFX j1 opp ëppi/n0 opp is:nunu is:singular
SFX j1 uch ichi/n0 uch is:nunu is:singular
SFX j1 rriss nu/n0 rriss is:nunu is:singular
SFX j1 es i/n0 es is:nunu is:singular
SFX j1 äiperlek impampel/n0 äiperlek is:nunu is:singular
SFX j1 umm immi/n0 umm is:nunu is:singular
SFX j1 and änni/n0 and is:nunu is:singular
SFX j1 over i/n0 over is:nunu is:singular
SFX j1 äiss issi/n0 äiss is:nunu is:singular

SFX y0 N 1
SFX y0 0 dst/a0 . is:adjective is:papr is:superlative

SFX Y0 N 9
SFX Y0 en tst/a0 [^djrtw]en is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y0 den tst/a0 [^d]den is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y0 dden ttst/a0 dden is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y0 en tst/a0 [^äio]ren is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y0 ren ertst/a0 [äio]ren is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y0 ën tst/a0 ën is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y0 jen chtst/a0 jen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y0 wen ftst/a0 wen is:adjective is:papa is:superlative
SFX Y0 en st/a0 ten is:adjective is:papa is:superlative

SFX m0 N 3
SFX m0 0 0 . is:plural
SFX m0 n 0 n is:plural is:eifeler
SFX m0 n 0 n is:eifeler

SFX p1 N 3
SFX p1 0 0 . is:toponym is:adjective
SFX p1 0 0/f6 . is:toponym is:masculine is:singular
SFX p1 0 0 . is:toponym is:masculine is:plural

SFX g1 N 9
SFX g1 en t [^djrtw]en is:papa
SFX g1 den t [^d]den is:papa
SFX g1 dden tt dden is:papa
SFX g1 en t [^äio]ren is:papa
SFX g1 ren ert [äio]ren is:papa
SFX g1 ën t ën is:papa
SFX g1 jen cht jen is:papa
SFX g1 wen ft wen is:papa
SFX g1 en 0 ten is:papa
