dictionaries/lb/index.dic
Assistenzmupp/n0k7 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
austrieden/v3t0x0 po:verb
beandrocken/v0X0x0y0g1w0 po:verb
Behandlungsland/u0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
bekäppen/v0X0g1w0 po:verb
beonrouegen/v0X0x0y0Y0g1w0 po:verb
beräicheren/v0X0x0g1w0 po:verb
Beruffsufänger/f6m0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Biwer/p1
Bop/n0k0i0i2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Boulevardblat/u1k7 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Bräitchemann/u0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
briechen/v3x0w0 po:verb
complotéieren/v0X0Y0g1w0 po:verb
constituéieren/v0X0g1w0 po:verb
Dafpätter/n0k1i0i2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Dag/e1s1s3 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
däin/h0 po:pronoun
Dampzuch/e1k7j1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
demoléieren/v0X0Y0g1w0 po:verb
dës/h0 po:pronoun
desequilibréieren/v0X0x0y0Y0g1w0 po:verb
Diplomatiker/f6m0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Douaneshaus/u1k7 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Dreckslach/u0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Drillingsbrudder/i0e1k7i2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
duerchmëschen/v0X0g1w0 po:verb
Eenelter/p1
eis/h0 po:pronoun
elektriséieren/v0X0x0Y0g1w0 po:verb
ëmfaassen/v0t0X0x0y0g1 po:verb
Enn/n0r0s2 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
enttäuschen/v0X0x0y0g1w0 po:verb
erausfuerderen/v0t0x0y0g0 po:verb
erfrëschen/v0X0x0y0g1w0 po:verb
erklären/v0X0g1w0 po:verb
exekutéieren/v0X0Y0g1w0 po:verb
expandéieren/v0X0x0Y0g1w0 po:verb
Exportland/u0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Figebam/e1k7 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Filmkritiker/f6m0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Firmpätter/n0k1i0i2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Fluessweiler/p1
fraudéieren/v0X0Y0g1w0 po:verb
Gaart/e0k6s1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Gebuertsdagskuss/n0j0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
gedëllegen/v0g1w0 po:verb
Geheimdéngschtpersoun/n0e1i3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Geméiszopp/n0k6j1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Geschäftspersoun/n0e1i3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Gesetz/r0s1 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Gewëssen/c0s2 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
glänzen/v0x0y0w0G0 po:verb
Griewer/f0f6m0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Gummispäerd/k0j0m0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Gutt/u1s2 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Haaptfach/u0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Haaptpersoun/n0e1i3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Hallefbrudder/i0e1k7i2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
hir/h0 po:pronoun
Hues/n0k7j0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Iener/p1
Ierfpätter/n0k1i0i2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Ierzenzopp/n0k6j1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Infoblat/u1k7 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
iwwerlaaschten/v0X0Y0g1w0 po:verb
Joer/l0k6s2s1 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
kalkuléieren/v0X0Y0g1w0 po:verb
Kampfkënschtler/f6m0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kéiber/p1
Këscht/n0k0j0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
kléngen/v0x0w0 po:verb
Knäpplach/u0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Knätsch/n0r0j0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Knouterpersoun/n0i3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Kontaktpersoun/n0e1i3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Kristallglas/u1k7 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Kürbiszopp/n0k6j1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Land/k6u0s1 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Léift/s1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Literaturnobelpräisdréier/f0f6m0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Loft/k8 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Luerenzweiler/p1
mäin/h0 po:pronoun
Meereen/c0k5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Mëttelspersoun/n0e1i3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Mieresloft/k8 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Minièreszuch/e1k7j1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Mond/k6u0j1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Mount/e0s0s2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
multiplizéieren/v0X0Y0g1w0 po:verb
Mupp/n0k7j1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Muselstad/k8 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Neijoerschzuch/e1k7j1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Noumer/p1
Nowuesssportler/f6m0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
ofschléissen/v0t0x0y0 po:verb
Ombudspersoun/n0i3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
ons/h0 po:pronoun
ophetzen/v0t0x0 po:verb
Ouschterhues/n0k7j0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Päckelcheszopp/n0k6j1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Piipcheswuert/k8 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Quartiersstuff/n0k7 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Quotemann/i0u0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
radotéieren/v0g1w0 po:verb
ramponéieren/v0X0Y0g1w0 po:verb
Rechner/m0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Reen/c0k5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Roudemer/p1
säin/h0 po:pronoun
Schäiss/j1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Schaukelpäerd/k0j0m0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
schockéieren/v0X0x0y0Y0g1w0 po:verb
Schockelashues/n0k7j0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
schützen/v0x0w0 po:verb
Septièmesschüler/f6m0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Septièmesspunt/n0j0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Siwwenaler/p1
Som/k8 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Sprangschlass/u0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Spunt/n0j0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Staf/e1k7 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Stéifbrudder/i0e1k7i2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Terrorermëttler/f6m0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Tomatenzopp/n0k6j1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Transgenderpersoun/n0i3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Urbop/n0k0i0i2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Urgroussbop/n0k0i0i2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
uschléissen/v0t0x0y0 po:verb
V-Persoun/n0e1i3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
verdäitlechen/v0X0Y0g1w0 po:verb
verdollen/v0X0g1w0 po:verb
Verkéiersamt/u0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Vertrauenspersoun/n0e1i3 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
vervollstännegen/v0X0Y0g1w0 po:verb
verzauberen/v0X0x0g1w0 po:verb
Walter/p1
Weil/k5 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Won/e1k7 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Zäit/n0k5 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
zerfränjelen/v0g1w0 po:verb
Zopp/n0k6j1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
zréckhalen/v3t0x0y0o0o1 po:verb
Zwillingsbrudder/i0e1k7i2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
